District of Columbia statutes.
28-4905

Construction and application.

This chapter must be construed and applied:

(1)

To facilitate electronic transactions consistent with other applicable law;

(2)

To be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic transactions and with the continued expansion of those practices; and

(3)

To effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 3502(b), 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 64, 51 DCR 881

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-105 validated previously made technical corrections.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3202(b) of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (1999 Act).